West Virginia, session 2025, SB133.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS. §3-1-52. Ranked choice voting prohibited. (a) Definitions:"Local government" means any municipality, county, school district, special taxing district, or any other regional or local district or unit of government that is governed by one or more elected officials."Ranked choice voting" or "instant runoff voting" means a method of casting and tabulating votes in which:(1) Voters rank candidates in order of preference;(2) Tabulation proceeds in rounds such that in each round either a candidate or candidates are elected or the last-place candidate is defeated;(3) Votes are transferred from elected or defeated candidates to the voters' next ranked candidate or candidates in order of preference; and(4) Tabulation ends when a candidate receives the majority of votes cast or the number of candidates elected equals the number of offices to be filled.(b) No state, county, or local elections office may use ranked choice voting or instant runoff voting to conduct an election or nomination of any candidate in this state for any local government, statewide, or federal elective office.(c) Any local government ordinance in conflict with this section is void.